bulgarian.aff
flag *P:
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“
    ¿        >      -¿,≈… »
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Õ»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÕŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÕŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÿ≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ŸŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,»
    ¿        >      -¿,»À
    ¿        >      -¿,»À¿
    ¿        >      -¿,»À¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,»À»
    ¿        >      -¿,»À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»À»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,»À»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,»ÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,»ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,»Ã
    ¿        >      -¿,»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»’
    ¿        >      -¿,»’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,»’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»’“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈… »
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÕŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÕŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»Ã
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ“

flag *Q:
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“»
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“Œ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ã
    ¿        >      -¿,≈“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈’“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÿ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÿ≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈… »
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÕŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÕŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»Ã
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸŒ“Œ
