bulgarian.dict
безобразнича/P
бистря/P
благодаря/Q
блещя/P
близня/Q
бодна/Q
боравя/P
бруля/P
бръмна/Q
будя/P
бухна/Q
бълболя/P
вадя/P
вглъбя/Q
вдетиня/Q
вдълбоча/P
вдълбя/Q
веля/Q
вехна/Q
викна/Q
вкаменя/Q
вклещя/P
вкоравя/Q
влача/P
вледеня/Q
вманиача/P
вметна/Q
водоснабдя/Q
водя/P
впусна/Q
вресна/Q
връцна/Q
връча/P
всмукна/Q
втечня/Q
втъкна/Q
вчовеча/P
въдворя/Q
възвиша/P
възвърна/Q
въздъхна/Q
възмездя/Q
възникна/Q
възправя/P
възпротивя/Q
възстановя/Q
въодушевя/Q
върша/P
гаврътна/Q
газя/P
гина/Q
гладя/P
глобя/Q
гмурна/Q
гнуся/Q
гоня/P
горя/QS
гракна/Q
грапя/P
грейна/Q
гримаснича/P
грохна/Q
гъзурча/P
гъна/Q
гърча/P
двоумя/Q
дежуря/P
дивя/Q
доближа/PW
доверя/Q
догоня/P
доизясня/Q
докача/P
доловя/Q
донося/P
дообясня/Q
допечатя/P
допусна/Q
допържа/P
досетя/P
досрамя/Q
достраша/P
дотъкмя/Q
дотътря/P
дразня/P
дремна/Q
дръзна/Q
дупча/P
духна/Q
дърля/P
жегна/Q
женя/P
жулна/Q
забавя/P
забегна/Q
забоботя/P
забраня/Q
забръщолевя/P
завардя/P
завехна/Q
завинтя/P
заводя/P
завърна/Q
загащя/P
загина/Q
заговорнича/P
загоря/Q
заграча/P
загърля/P
загърна/Q
задиря/P
задмина/Q
задълбоча/P
заженя/P
зажумя/Q
зазимя/Q
закаля/Q
закахъря/P
заклатя/P
заключа/P
закрепна/Q
закриля/Q
закупя/P
закъкря/P
закърша/P
залепна/Q
заловя/Q
залюбя/P
замеся/P
заметна/Q
заморя/Q
замъгля/Q
замърморя/P
заобиколя/Q
заобля/P
запаля/P
заперча/P
запладня/Q
запокитя/P
запостя/Q
заправя/P
запрегна/Q
запреча/P
запустя/Q
запуша/P
заработя/P
зарасна/Q
заровя/P
заръмя/Q
засвиря/P
заседна/Q
заситня/P
засмоля/Q
засрамя/PQ
застана/Q
застина/Q
застъпя/P
засъхна/Q
затиря/P
затисна/Q
заточа/P
затрогна/Q
затуря/P
затъкмя/Q
затъня/Q
затътря/P
захиля/P
захладя/Q
зачекна/Q
зачерня/P
зачестя/Q
зашаря/P
зашумоля/Q
заякна/Q
злосторнича/P
злоупотребя/Q
зяпеня/P
избегна/Q
избистря/P
избродя/P
избухна/Q
избърборя/P
извиня/Q
извиша/P
извърша/P
изгася/Q
изгоня/P
изгоря/QS
издавя/P
издуша/P
издъхна/Q
изженя/P
изкастря/P
изкикотя/P
изкисна/Q
изключа/P
изкормя/P
изкривя/Q
изкуша/P
изкъртя/P
изловя/Q
излоча/P
измамя/P
измина/Q
измисля/P
измъдря/P
измърся/Q
изнамеря/P
изнервя/P
изнуря/Q
изоблича/P
изостана/Q
изпатя/P
изпиля/Q
изплесна/Q
изпогазя/P
изпокърша/P
изпочупя/P
изпраша/P
изпрося/P
изпръхна/Q
изпъдя/P
изпъстря/P
изравня/Q
изредя/Q
изрепча/P
изруся/Q
изсвиря/P
изслужа/P
изстена/QX
изтегля/P
изтегна/Q
изтровя/P
изтръгна/Q
изтъпаня/P
изтърколя/Q
изтътря/P
изхайтя/P
изхвръкна/Q
изхлузя/P
изцвиля/P
изцеря/Q
изчистя/P
изшиля/P
изшумоля/Q
искря/Q
каня/P
капна/Q
катеря/P
квася/P
кепазя/Q
кипна/Q
китя/P
клася/Q
клепна/Q
клокотя/P
клъцна/Q
кокетнича/P
контузя/P
кореня/Q
котя/P
крепна/Q
криволя/Q
кръстя/P
кусна/Q
къдря/P
кървя/Q
къркоря/P
кърша/P
легна/Q
лепя/Q
лигавя/P
литна/Q
лоча/P
лупна/Q
любезнича/P
люшна/Q
мазня/P
маскаря/Q
меря/P
метна/Q
миря/Q
млатя/P
мразя/P
мръзна/Q
мутолевя/P
мъкна/Q
мърля/P
мярна/Q
мяуча/P
наближа/PVW
набрашня/Q
набъбря/P
навестя/Q
навеся/P
навлажня/Q
навърша/P
нагизна/Q
нагладя/P
нагорещя/Q
награбя/P
награмадя/Q
надвисна/Q
надвися/P
надмина/Q
надплатя/Q
надработя/P
надупча/P
надхитря/Q
надя/P
назнача/P
назърна/Q
наизскоча/P
накамаря/Q
накачуля/P
накича/P
наклоня/Q
накупя/P
накърня/Q
накърша/P
наломя/Q
налуча/P
намеся/P
наметна/Q
намръщя/P
намъкна/Q
намъча/P
напакостя/Q
напаля/P
наперча/P
наплаша/P
наподобя/Q
напомня/P
напреча/P
напълня/P
напъна/Q
напътя/P
нарина/Q
наруша/P
насапуня/Q
населя/P
насладя/Q
наслюнча/P
насоля/Q
настеля/P
настигна/Q
насълзя/Q
натегля/P
натопля/P
натопя/Q
натруфя/P
науловя/Q
нахалнича/P
нахлупя/P
нацупя/P
начервя/Q
начумеря/P
нащърбя/P
недооценя/Q
нося/P
обагря/P
обваря/Q
обгърна/Q
обезводня/Q
обезкосмя/Q
обезлича/P
обезлюдя/Q
обезнаследя/Q
обезпраша/P
обезсмъртя/Q
обезформя/P
обезчестя/Q
обзаложа/P
облагородя/Q
облажа/P
облъхна/Q
облъча/P
обновя/Q
обоготворя/Q
оборудя/P
обременя/Q
обруля/P
обсегна/Q
обточа/P
обхвана/Q
овакантя/Q
оглавя/Q
огладя/P
огорча/P
ограмотя/Q
одухотворя/P
одушевя/Q
ожесточа/P
ожъна/Q
озадача/P
озеленя/Q
озъбя/P
окадя/Q
окирливя/Q
окича/P
окосмя/Q
окотя/P
окуця/Q
окърша/P
олихвя/Q
омасля/Q
омекча/P
оневиня/Q
опаля/P
опиянча/P
оплодотворя/Q
опороча/P
опраша/P
опропастя/Q
опуша/P
оригиналнича/P
орося/Q
осеменя/Q
оскрежа/P
ослепя/Q
оставя/P
осъвременя/Q
отавя/P
отвинтя/P
отвратя/Q
отдалеча/P
отдъхна/Q
отключа/P
открехна/Q
откъртя/P
отлъча/P
отморя/Q
отпоря/P
отпочина/Q
отпуша/P
отроня/P
отседна/Q
отсъдя/P
оттласна/Q
отходя/P
охладя/Q
охлузя/P
ощавя/P
пакостя/Q
пердаша/P
пиля/Q
пленя/Q
плещя/P
победя/Q
поверя/Q
поводя/P
погасна/Q
поговоря/P
погражданя/Q
подвоумя/Q
подгоня/P
подкожуря/P
подкося/Q
подмина/Q
поднося/P
подпомогна/Q
подпържа/P
подремна/Q
подскоча/P
подслоня/Q
подчиня/Q
поевропейча/P
позаекна/Q
позакърпя/P
позатихна/Q
поизгладя/P
поизкривя/Q
поизнося/P
поизравня/Q
покатеря/P
покося/Q
половя/Q
положа/P
полулегна/Q
помисля/P
помръдна/Q
понабавя/P
понадигна/Q
понадуша/P
понаостря/P
понапрегна/Q
понатроша/P
понижа/PW
поогранича/P
пооживя/Q
поопаря/P
поостана/Q
поотегча/P
поотпадна/Q
поочупя/P
попазаря/Q
попресоля/Q
попрехвърля/P
пораздразня/P
порасна/Q
поробя/P
посветна/Q
поселя/P
поскъся/Q
посрамя/P
посръбна/Q
потвърдя/Q
потретя/P
потъна/Q
поусмихна/Q
поуталожа/P
похристиянча/P
почина/Q
празнословя/P
прасна/Q
пребуля/P
прегладя/P
прегоря/QS
предвижа/P
предопределя/Q
предреша/P
прежуря/P
презаредя/Q
прекратя/Q
прекръстя/P
премигна/Q
премрежа/P
преосигуря/Q
препеня/P
препроводя/P
прерасна/Q
пресекна/Q
пресиля/P
престегна/Q
претегля/P
преуморя/Q
префиня/P
прещипна/Q
прибавя/P
прикадя/Q
приканя/P
примеся/P
примиря/Q
припечеля/P
приповдигна/Q
присегна/Q
пристисна/Q
присторя/P
притъпя/Q
приуча/P
прищипна/Q
провиня/Q
проводя/P
прокрадна/Q
прокудя/P
пропадна/Q
проработя/P
просна/Q
просуша/P
противя/Q
прочистя/P
проявя/Q
пушна/Q
пържа/P
разбудя/P
развеселя/Q
развратнича/P
разгневя/Q
разгоня/P
разгърна/Q
раздиря/P
разискря/Q
разклатя/P
разкървавя/Q
разложа/P
размина/Q
разнебитя/P
разперя/P
разпна/Q
разпусна/Q
разпъдя/P
разселя/P
разсъмна/Q
разсърдя/P
разтроша/P
разхитя/Q
разхлабя/P
разясня/Q
реша/PR
ритна/Q
ръководя/P
ръмоля/Q
самоиздигна/Q
самоизключа/P
самопоканя/P
сборя/P
свеня/Q
свистя/Q
своенравнича/P
сграбя/P
сгъна/Q
сдуша/P
скастря/P
скимна/Q
скоча/P
скрипя/Q
следя/Q
сложа/P
смигна/Q
смрача/P
смукна/Q
сниша/P
соля/Q
спечеля/P
сплъстя/Q
спотиря/P
сприятеля/Q
срещна/Q
стесня/Q
стоваря/P
стресна/Q
суетя/Q
съборя/P
съжаля/Q
съоръжа/P
сърбя/Q
съсухря/P
творя/Q
тормозя/P
торя/Q
троша/P
трупна/Q
турна/Q
търколя/Q
търмъча/P
увеся/P
увехна/Q
угодя/Q
уединя/Q
ужиля/P
укрепя/Q
умиротворя/Q
умокря/P
уподобя/Q
уредя/Q
усетя/P
усмихна/Q
утесня/Q
уча/P
уясня/Q
хваля/P
хилядя/Q
хукна/Q
хуля/P
ценя/Q
цупя/P
цъфна/Q
числя/Q
чудя/P
ширя/P
шумна/Q
щракна/Q
